District of Columbia statutes.
29-1101

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act of 2010”.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).